Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-6,106
Refusal to provide information; effect.

Nothing in the Parkinson's Disease Registry Act requires a physician or pharmacist to deny medical treatment or services to an individual who refuses to provide the information necessary to make complete reports required under section 81-6,102 or 81-6,103.

Laws 2001, LB 152, § 14.